Maine, session 132, LD1479.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §6000, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Home-sharing agreement. "Home-sharing agreement" means an agreement
made between a landlord who is an individual 65 years of age or older who owns and
occupies a residence and a tenant who leases a room in that residence. A home-sharing
agreement is deemed a tenancy at will.
Sec. 2. 14 MRSA §6002, sub-§1, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 103, §3, is
amended to read:
E. The tenant or the tenant's guest or invitee is the perpetrator of violence, a threat of
violence or sexual assault against another tenant, a tenant's guest, the landlord or the
landlord's employee or agent, except that this paragraph does not apply to a tenant who
is a victim as defined in section 6000, subsection 4 and who has taken reasonable action
under the circumstances to comply with the landlord's request for protection of the
tenant, another tenant, a tenant's guest or invitee, the landlord or the landlord's
employee or agent or of the landlord's property; or
Sec. 3. 14 MRSA §6002, sub-§1, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 103, §3, is
amended to read:
F. The person occupying the premises is not an authorized occupant of the premises.;
or
Sec. 4. 14 MRSA §6002, sub-§1, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. The tenant subject to a home-sharing agreement violates a provision of that home-
sharing agreement.
Sec. 5. 14 MRSA §6004, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Home-sharing agreements; expedited process. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, a landlord participating in a home-sharing agreement is entitled to
an expedited process of forcible entry and detainer against a tenant as follows:
A. The landlord shall provide the tenant with written notice of eviction, and state the
violation of the home-sharing agreement for which the tenant is being evicted;
B. No later than 7 days following notice of eviction by the landlord pursuant to
paragraph A, the tenant must vacate the premises; and
C. A tenant who fails to vacate the premises within 7 days following the notice of
eviction pursuant to paragraph A is deemed a trespasser without right, and the tenant's
goods and property are considered to be abandoned and subject to section 6013. The
landlord may request the sheriff or other law enforcement officer having jurisdiction
over the area where the premises is located to assist the landlord in evicting the tenant.